apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!-- Lower Sorbian -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCČDEFGHIJKŁLMNOPRSŠŚTUWYZŽŹabcčćdeěfghijkłlmnńoprŕsšśtuwyzžź</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="du"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="co__det">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>co</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>cogo</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>comu</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>co</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>cym</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>com</l>
	  <r>co<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="což__det">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>což</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>cogož</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>comuž</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>což</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>cymž</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>comž</l>
	  <r>což<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- m 22 -->
    <pardef n="tyźe/ń__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoju</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njom</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nju</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njowu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njow</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njam</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njami</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njach</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pjaka/ŕ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŕ</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rja</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjoju</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rja</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjom</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rju</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rja</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjowu</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjoma</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjowu</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjoma</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjoma</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rje</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjow</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjam</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rje</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rjow</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjami</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rjach</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="co"><i></i><par n="co__det"/></e>
    <e lm="což"><i></i><par n="což__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tyźeń"><i>tyźe</i><par n="tyźe/ń__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pjakaŕ"><i>pjaka</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n"/></e>
